crk_oahpa_project/crk_data/englexc/eng.twolc
Alphabet

a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z 
n2:n %>:0 e2:0 x2:0 ;


Sets
Vow = a e o u i ;
Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x y z ;

Rules

"an Rule"
n2:0 <=> a _ ?  Cns ;

"Noun affix vowel rule"
e2:e <=> [x|s h] %>:0 _  ;
        
"Verb affix vowel rule"
e:0 <=> e %>:0 _  ;
        
! bake>ed:bake00d
! face>es:face00s
